Nevada, session 83, SB196.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 361 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 3 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 4 to 10, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. 1. “Affiliate” means a person who, directly or
indirectly, through one or more persons or intermediaries,
controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a
specified person.
2. As used in this section, “control” means:
(a) Direct or indirect ownership, control or possession of 50
percent or more of the equity ownership of a person; or
(b) Possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a person,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or
through other means.
Sec. 5. 1. “Heavy equipment rental company” means a
person who is classified under 532412 or 532310 of the North
American Industry Classification System, and is primarily
engaged in the business of renting heavy equipment rental
property, without an operator, to the public from a location in this
State.
2. The term does not include a person who is:
(a) Engaged in the business of renting heavy equipment rental
property primarily to related persons or affiliates who operate or
drive, or both operate and drive, such equipment, regardless of the
NAICS code that applies to the business; or
(b) Primarily engaged in the business of renting heavy
equipment rental property with an operator.
Sec. 6. “Heavy equipment rental property” means property,
machinery and equipment held in the inventory of a heavy
equipment rental company for sale or rental in the regular course
of business. The term includes, without limitation, property,
machinery and equipment that is customarily used or designed for
construction and industrial purposes, including, without
limitation, earthmoving equipment, lift equipment, material
handling equipment, pumps, generators, compressors, portable
power equipment, heating, ventilation and air conditioning
equipment, portable offices, containers, tank trailers and self-
propelled equipment.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 7. “North American Industry Classification System” or
“NAICS” means the 2022 North American Industry Classification
System, as published by the Bureau of the Census of the United
States Department of Commerce.
Sec. 8. “Rent,” “rental” or “renting” means entering into an
agreement with a heavy equipment rental company for the use of
heavy equipment rental property in exchange for consideration for
a period:
1. Not to exceed 365 days; or
2. That is open-ended under the terms of the rental contract
with no specified end date.
Sec. 9. 1. “Rental charge” means the total amount of
consideration, including, without limitation, cash, credit, property
and services, charged by a heavy equipment rental company for
the rental of heavy equipment rental property, valued in money,
whether received in money or otherwise, and without any
deduction for:
(a) The cost of the heavy equipment rental property to the
heavy equipment rental company;
(b) The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest
paid, losses, the cost of transportation to the heavy equipment
rental company, taxes imposed on the heavy equipment rental
company or any other expense of the heavy equipment rental
company; and
(c) Any charges by the heavy equipment rental company for
any services necessary to complete the rental, including, without
limitation, any delivery charges which are not stated separately
and any installation charges which are not stated separately.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Any fees or charges for the delivery or transportation of
heavy equipment rental property which are stated separately;
(b) Any installation or other service charges which are stated
separately;
(c) Any discounts, including, without limitation, those in the
form of cash, term or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party, which are allowed by the heavy equipment rental company
and taken by the renter on a rental;
(d) Any interest, financing or carrying charges from credit
extended on the rental of heavy equipment rental property, if
stated separately;
(e) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the renter which are
stated separately; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(f) Any other separately stated charges or fees, including,
without limitation, any separately stated fee for recovery of
property taxes imposed on heavy equipment rental property
pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 10. “Renter” means a person who rents heavy
equipment rental property from a heavy equipment rental
company in this State.
Sec. 11. 1. Each person responsible for maintaining the
records of a heavy equipment rental company shall:
(a) Keep such records as may be necessary to determine the
compliance of the heavy equipment rental company with the
provisions of section 15 of this act;
(b) Preserve such records for 5 years or until any litigation or
prosecution related to compliance with section 15 of this act is
finally determined, whichever is longer; and
(c) Make such records available for inspection by the
Department upon demand at reasonable times during regular
business hours.
2. The Department may adopt regulations specifying the types
of records which must be kept to determine the compliance of a
heavy equipment rental company with the provisions of section 15
of this act.
Sec. 12. To verify the accuracy of any report filed pursuant
to section 15 of this act or, if no such report is filed, to determine
the compliance of a heavy equipment rental company with section
15 of this act, the Department, or any person authorized in writing
by the Department, may examine the books, papers and records of
any person who is required to comply with section 15 of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 14 of
this act, a heavy equipment rental company may impose a recovery
fee in an amount not to exceed 2 percent of the rental charge for
the rental of heavy equipment rental property to a renter.
2. The amount of any recovery fee imposed pursuant to
subsection 1 must be separately stated on an invoice provided to a
renter of heavy equipment rental property.
3. A heavy equipment rental company that imposes a recovery
fee pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Hold the amount of all recovery fees collected in a separate
account; and
(b) Use the money in the separate account only to offset any
taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter on heavy equipment rental
property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Sec. 14. A heavy equipment rental company shall not charge
a recovery fee pursuant to section 13 of this act for the rental of
any heavy equipment rental property to:
1. The United States, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities;
2. Any incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United
States wholly owned by the United States or by a corporation
wholly owned by the United States;
3. The State of Nevada, its unincorporated agencies and
instrumentalities;
4. Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of
this State; and
5. Any other person or entity that this State is prohibited from
taxing under the United States Constitution, laws or treaties of the
United States or the Nevada Constitution.
Sec. 15. Not later than August 15 of each calendar year, a
heavy equipment rental company that imposes a recovery fee
pursuant to section 13 of this act shall file with the Department,
on a form prescribed by the Department, a report which separately
states the amount of:
1. The recovery fees collected by the heavy equipment rental
company during the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
2. The taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter on the heavy
equipment rental property of the heavy equipment rental company
for the immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 16. 1. A person shall not:
(a) Make, cause to be made or permit to be made any false or
fraudulent report or false statement in any report with intent to
defraud in violation of the requirements of subsection 3 of section
13 of this act;
(b) Make, cause to be made or permit to be made any false
entry in books, records or accounts with intent to defraud in
violation of the requirements of subsection 3 of section 13 of this
act; or
(c) Keep, cause to be kept or permit to be kept more than one
set of books, records or accounts with intent to defraud in
violation of the requirements of subsection 3 of section 13 of this
act.
2. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Secs. 17 and 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)